Maryland, session 2026, HB1143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
11–1010.
(b) This section applies only with respect to a victim whose initial determination
of cause or manner of death recorded on the victim’s death certificate under § 4–212 of the
Health – General Article was amended or corrected to be undetermined or homicide under
[§ 5–309(d)(2)] § 5–309(E)(2) of the Health – General Article.
Article – Health – General
5–309.
(a) If the cause of death is established to a reasonable degree of medical certainty,
the medical examiner who investigates the case shall file in the medical examiner’s office
a report on the cause of death within 30 days after notification of the case.
(b) (1) If the medical examiner who investigates a medical examiner’s case
considers an autopsy necessary, the Chief Medical Examiner, a deputy chief medical

HOUSE BILL 1143 3
examiner, an assistant medical examiner, or a pathologist authorized by the Chief Medical
Examiner shall perform the autopsy.
(2) If the family of the deceased objects to an autopsy on religious grounds,
the autopsy may not be performed unless authorized by the Chief Medical Examiner or by
the Chief Medical Examiner’s designee.
(3) (i) In accordance with normal standards of medical practice, the
medical examiner performing the autopsy may retain any medical evidence, tissue, or organ
needed to carry out the duties of this subtitle.
(ii) The medical examiner shall dispose of any medical evidence,
tissue, or organ under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph in accordance with normal
standards of medical practice.
(C) (1) IF PERFORMING A PERINATAL AUTOPSY TO DETERMINE
WHETHER THE DEATH RESULTED IN A STILLBIRTH OR OCCURRED AFTER A LIVE
BIRTH, THE CHIEF MEDICAL EXAMINER, A DEPUTY CHIEF MEDICAL EXAMINER, AN
ASSISTANT MEDICAL EXAMINER, OR A PATHOLOGIST AUTHORIZED BY THE CHIEF
MEDICAL EXAMINER MAY NOT USE A HYDROSTATIC LUNG TEST, ALSO KNOWN AS A
LUNG FLOAT TEST.
(2) A PARENT, GUARDIAN, OR LEGAL REPRESENTATIVE OF THE
SUBJECT OF A PERINATAL AUTOPSY MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION AGAINST THE CHIEF
MEDICAL EXAMINER, A DEPUTY CHIEF MEDICAL EXAMINER, AN ASSISTANT
MEDICAL EXAMINER, OR A PATHOLOGIST AUTHORIZED BY THE CHIEF MEDICAL
EXAMINER WHO VIOLATES PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
[(c)] (D) (1) A medical examiner shall conduct an autopsy of any fire fighter
and any sworn personnel of the State Fire Marshal’s Office who dies in the line of duty or
as a result of injuries sustained in the line of duty.
(2) The autopsy shall include:
(i) A toxicological analysis for toxic fumes;
(ii) Gross and microscopic studies of heart, lung, and any other
tissue involved;
(iii) Appropriate studies of blood and urine; and
(iv) Appropriate studies of body fluids and body tissues.
(3) If the medical examiner determines toxic fumes were the cause of death,
the medical examiner shall:

HOUSE BILL 1143
(i) Investigate to the extent possible the source of the fumes; and
(ii) Prepare a written report on the specific effects of the fumes on
human tissue.
(4) The autopsy and analysis shall be sufficient to determine eligibility for
benefits under the federal Public Safety Officers’ Benefits Act of 1976.
[(d)] (E) (1) (i) The individual who performs the autopsy shall prepare
detailed written findings during the progress of the autopsy.
(ii) The findings prepared under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph
and the conclusions drawn from them shall be filed in the office of the medical examiner for
the county where the death occurred.
(iii) The original copy of the findings and conclusions shall be filed in
the Office.
(iv) The Department and the Committee may not interfere with the
clinical findings or conclusions prepared under subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph.
(2) (i) Except in a case of a finding of homicide, a person in interest as
defined in § 4–101 of the General Provisions Article may request the medical examiner to
correct findings and conclusions on the cause and manner of death recorded on a certificate
of death under § 4–502 of the General Provisions Article within 180 days after the medical
examiner files those findings and conclusions.
(ii) 1. If the Chief Medical Examiner denies the request of a
person in interest to correct findings and conclusions on the cause and manner of death,
the person in interest may appeal the denial to the Secretary, who shall refer the matter to
the Office of Administrative Hearings.
2. A contested case hearing under this subparagraph shall be
a hearing both on the denial and on the establishment of the findings and conclusions on
the cause and manner of death.
(iii) The administrative law judge shall submit findings of fact to the
Secretary.
(iv) After reviewing the findings of the administrative law judge, the
Secretary, or the Secretary’s designee, shall issue an order to:
1. Adopt the findings of the administrative law judge; or
2. Reject the findings of the administrative law judge, and
affirm the findings of the medical examiner.

HOUSE BILL 1143 5
(v) The appellant may appeal a rejection under subparagraph (iv)2
of this paragraph to a circuit court of competent jurisdiction.
(vi) If the final decision of the Secretary, or of the Secretary’s
designee, or of a court of competent jurisdiction on appeal, establishes a different finding
or conclusion on the cause or manner of death of a deceased than that recorded on the
certificate of death, the medical examiner shall:
1. Amend the certificate to reflect the different finding or
conclusion under §§ 4–212 and 4–214 of this article and § 4–502 of the General Provisions
Article; and
2. If the cause or manner of death was amended or corrected
to be undetermined or homicide:
A. Provide notice to the State’s Attorney and the local law
enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where the body was found of the different finding or
conclusion on the cause or manner of death of the deceased than that previously recorded
on the death certificate; and
B. Request that the Secretary send the person in interest a
certified death certificate with the cause or manner of death amended in accordance with
item 1 of this subparagraph at no cost to the person in interest.
(vii) The final decision of the Secretary, or the Secretary’s designee,
or of a court under this paragraph may not give rise to any presumption concerning the
application of any provision of or the resolution of any claim concerning a policy of insurance
relating to the deceased.
(viii) If the findings of the medical examiner are upheld by the
Secretary, the appellant is responsible for the costs of the contested case hearing.
Otherwise, the Department is responsible for the costs of the hearing.
[(e)] (F) The Chief Medical Examiner shall set a reasonable fee for performing
an autopsy by an authorized pathologist.
Article – Health Occupations
14–404.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 14–405 of this subtitle, a disciplinary
panel, on the affirmative vote of a majority of the quorum of the disciplinary panel, may
reprimand any licensee, place any licensee on probation, or suspend or revoke a license if
the licensee:
(46) Fails to comply with the requirements of the Prescription Drug
Monitoring Program under Title 21, Subtitle 2A of the Health – General Article; [or]

HOUSE BILL 1143
(47) Willfully makes a misrepresentation to a disciplinary panel; OR
(48) VIOLATES § 5–309(C) OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
Article – Public Safety
3–533.
(b) If a law enforcement agency is notified by a medical examiner under [§
5–309(d)] § 5–309(E) of the Health – General Article, the law enforcement agency:
(1) shall reopen or reinvestigate an investigation involving the death of a
victim whose cause or manner of death was amended or corrected to be undetermined or
homicide; and
(2) may not close a case that was reopened or reinvestigated under item (1)
of this subsection until at least 20 years after the law enforcement agency was notified.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2027, the Maryland Department of Health, in consultation with the Office of the Attorney
General and the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner, shall report to the Senate Finance
Committee and the House Health Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, on:
(1) the usefulness and efficacy of the hydrostatic lung test, also known as
a lung float test, in determining whether a death was the result of a stillbirth or occurred
after a live birth; and
(2) recommendations as to whether the test described in item (1) of this
section continues to be needed as an autopsy tool.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. Section 1 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at
the end of September 30, 2028, Section 1 of this Act, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.